Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2609 (2) 91 ss/ns/md H.F. 2609 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.407 Synthetic media ââ 1 disclosure. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âPerson who is responsibleâ means the person who pays for 4 the publication or creation of published material. âPerson who 5 is responsibleâ does not mean a media or technology organization 6 publishing, broadcasting, distributing, or hosting published 7 material on behalf of another person. 8 b. (1) âSynthetic mediaâ means an image, audio recording, 9 or video recording of an individualâs appearance, speech, or 10 conduct that has been intentionally manipulated with the use 11 of any form of digital technology in a manner to create a 12 realistic but false image, audio recording, or video recording 13 that produces any of the following: 14 (a) A depiction of an individual in appearance, speech, or 15 conduct that a reasonable individual would believe depicts a 16 real individual. 17 (b) A materially different understanding or impression than 18 a reasonable individual would have from the unaltered, original 19 version of the image, audio recording, or video recording. 20 (2) âSynthetic mediaâ does not include content created 21 using digital technology solely for text generation, grammar 22 correction, spelling checks, stylistic editing, or enhancing 23 existing content without creating a new impersonation of a 24 human likeness or voice. 25 2. Published material, as defined in section 68A.405, that 26 contains synthetic media must prominently include the words 27 âTHIS CONTENT GENERATED USING SYNTHETIC MEDIAâ. The person 28 who is responsible for the published material has the sole 29 responsibility and liability for inclusion of the disclosure 30 required by this subsection. 31 3. The inclusion of the disclosure required by this section 32 does not preclude a person from pursuing any other remedies 33 under law for the publication of synthetic media. 34 4. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 35 -1- HF 2609 (2) 91 ss/ns/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2609 implement this section. 1 -2- HF 2609 (2) 91 ss/ns/md 2/ 2